Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 71 The Rhode Island Educational Records Bill of Rights

16-71-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the “Educational Records Bill of Rights Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1.

16-71-2.
Notification.

The parents or guardians of each child enrolled in an elementary or secondary school within the state, or the student if over the age of eighteen (18), shall annually be notified in writing by the school district responsible for the operation of the school of their rights under this chapter. Agencies and institutions of elementary and secondary education shall provide for the need to effectively notify parents of students identified as having a primary or home language other than English.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1.

16-71-3.
Educational records access and review rights — Confidentiality of records.

The parent, legal guardian, or eligible student, shall have the following enumerated rights:

The right to personally inspect and review records in existence at the time of the request that are required to be kept by law or regulation of the student within ten (10) days of the request. The request shall be made to the school’s principal or designated appropriate authority;

The right to a reasonable explanation and interpretation of the records;

The right to copies of the records. The cost per copied page of written records shall not exceed fifteen cents ($.15) per page for records copyable on common business or legal size paper. No fee will be assessed to search for or to retrieve the records;

The right to have the records preserved as long as a request to inspect is outstanding;

The right to request an amendment and/or expungement of the records if the parent or eligible student believes that the information contained in these records is inaccurate, misleading, or in violation of the student’s right to privacy; this request shall be made in writing to the appropriate records keeper.

The right to place a statement in the record commenting on any contested information in the record. This statement shall be maintained with the contested part of the record for as long as the record is maintained and it shall be disclosed when the portion of the record to which it relates is disclosed;

The right to have the records kept confidential and not released to any other individual, agency or organization without prior written consent of the parent, legal guardian or eligible student, except to the extent that the release of the records is authorized by the provisions of 20 U.S.C. § 1232g or other applicable law or court process.

Any person aggrieved under this chapter shall have the right to appeal in accordance with the provisions of chapter 39 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 97, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 106, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 501, § 73.

16-71-4.
Decisions.

Should a decision be rendered against the school system, the records shall be corrected by the school system in accordance with the decision.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1.

16-71-5.
Parents and guardians.

The rights of parents as enumerated in this chapter shall also pertain to legal guardians.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1.

16-71-6.
“Records” defined.

For the purposes of this chapter the term “records” shall be defined in accordance with the definition of “education records” contained in 20 U.S.C. § 1232g.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 306, § 1.